Utah statutes.
63M-1-1202.   Findings -- Purpose.

(1)  The Legislature finds that:

(a)  fundamental changes have occurred in national and international financial markets and in the state's financial markets;

(b)  a critical shortage of seed and venture capital resources exists in the state, and that shortage is impairing the growth of commerce in the state;

(c)  a need exists to increase the availability of venture equity capital for emerging, expanding, and restructuring enterprises in Utah, including enterprises in the life sciences, advanced manufacturing, and information technology;

(d)  increased venture equity capital investments in emerging, expanding, and restructuring enterprises in Utah will:

(i)  create new jobs in the state; and

(ii)  help to diversify the state's economic base; and

(e)  a well-trained work force is critical for the maintenance and development of Utah's economy.

(2)  This part is enacted to:

(a)  mobilize private investment in a broad variety of venture capital partnerships in diversified industries and locales;

(b)  retain the private-sector culture of focusing on rate of return in the investing process;

(c)  secure the services of the best managers in the venture capital industry, regardless of location;

(d)  facilitate the organization of the Utah fund of funds to seek private investments and to serve as a catalyst in those investments by offering state incentives for private persons to make investments in the Utah fund of funds;

(e)  enhance the venture capital culture and infrastructure in the state so as to increase venture capital investment within the state and to promote venture capital investing within the state;

(f)  accomplish the purposes referred to in Subsections (2)(a) through (e) in a manner that would maximize the direct economic impact for the state; and

(g)  authorize the issuance and use of contingent tax credits to accomplish the purposes referred to in Subsections (2)(a) through (e) while protecting the interests of the state by limiting the manner in which contingent tax credits are issued, registered, transferred, claimed as an offset to the payment of state income tax, and redeemed.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

